dictsource/uk_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Translation rules for Ukrainian

// Special characters:
// A  vowel:                   а е и о у э ю я і
// B  soft consonant:          ь й ч щ
// C  any consonant:           б в г ґ д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ь
// F  consonant, not hard:     б в г ґ д з й к л м н п р с т ф х ч щ ь
// G  voiced:                  б в г ґ д ж з
// H  hard consonant:          ж ц ш
// Y  iotated vowel, softsign: ь ю я

.group а
       а       a

.group б
       б       b

.group в
       в       v

.group ґ
       ґ       g
       
.group г
       г       h

.group д
       д       d

.group е
       е       e

.group є
       є       e

.group ж
       ж       Z

.group з
       з       z

.group и
       и       i

.group і
       і       i

.group ї
       ї       i

.group й
       й       j

.group к
       к       k

.group л
       л       l

.group м
       м       m

.group н
       н       n

.group о
       о       o

.group п
       п       p

.group р
       р       r

.group с
       с       s

.group т
       т       t

.group у
       у       u

.group ф
       ф       f

.group х
       х       x

.group ц
       ц       ts

.group ч
       ч       tS;

.group ш
       ш       S

.group щ
       щ       S;

.group ь
       ь       ;

.group ю
       ю       ju

.group я
       я       ja
